Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.64.100

Statewide measures—Funds for additional expenses.

Each county auditor shall file with the secretary of state a statement listing only the additional expenses incurred whenever a mandatory recount of the votes cast on a state measure is made as provided in RCW 29A.64.090. The secretary of state shall include in his or her biennial budget request a provision for sufficient funds to carry out the provisions of this section. Payments hereunder shall be from appropriations specifically provided for such purpose by law.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1610; 1977 ex.s. c 144 s 5; 1973 c 82 s 2. Formerly RCW 29.64.090.]